Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-266.01
County agricultural society; dissolution; reformation; procedure.

(1) A county agricultural society may be dissolved and reformed as either an elected or appointed county fair board as provided in this section in addition to any other procedure for dissolution provided by law.

(2) A county agricultural society board may by resolution request the county board to place the question of reformation of the society before the registered voters of the county.

(3) Upon the adoption of a resolution under subsection (2) of this section, the county board shall place the question of reformation on the ballot at any primary, general, or special election. If a majority of those voting on the question vote for reformation, the county board shall proceed with the statutory requirements to form the new entity.

(4) Any contract, action, rule, regulation, resolution, or other matter made, done, or performed by and within the scope of the county agricultural society's authority shall remain in force and effect. Any real or personal property, rights, or credits and any duty, debt, or liability of the society shall automatically transfer to the new entity on the date of the entity's first meeting. Upon such transfer, the society shall automatically be dissolved. The county agricultural society shall file the notice of transfers and dissolutions with the register of deeds.

Laws 1999, LB 437, § 21.